pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Wingfoiling > Akcesoria do wingfoila: Torby i pokrowce na wingfoil; Leashe do wingfoila; Pompki do wingfoila; Zestawy naprawcze do wingfoila; Stroje ochronne do wingfoilingu
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วิงฟอยล์ > อุปกรณ์เสริมวิงฟอยล์: กระเป๋าใส่และที่ครอบวิงฟอยล์; สายรัดข้อเท้าวิงฟอยล์; ที่สูบลมวิงฟอยล์; ชุดเครื่องมือซ่อมวิงฟอยล์; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันวิงฟอยล์
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윙포일링 > 윙포일 액세서리: 윙포일 캐리백 및 커버; 윙포일 리시; 윙포일 펌프; 윙포일 수리 키트; 윙포일 보호 장비
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil-tillbehör: Wingfoil bärväskor och fodral; Leashar för wingfoil; Pumpar för wingfoil; Reparationskit för wingfoil; Skyddsutrustning för wingfoiling
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Wingfoil > Wingfoil Aksesuarları: Wingfoil Taşıma Çantaları ve Kılıfları; Wingfoil leash'leri; Wingfoil pompaları; Wingfoil tamir kitleri; Wingfoil Koruyucu Donanımı
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil Accessories: Wingfoil Carry Bags & Covers; Wingfoil Leashes; Wingfoil Pumps; Wingfoil Repair Kits; Wingfoiling Protective Gear
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Wingfoiling > Αξεσουάρ Wingfoil: Τσάντες & καλύμματα μεταφοράς Wingfoil; Ιμάντες ασφαλείας (leashes) wingfoil; Τρόμπες wingfoil; Κιτ επισκευής wingfoil; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός Wingfoiling
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл > Аксесоари за уингфойл: Чанти и калъфи за уингфойл; Каишки за уингфойл; Помпи за уиндфойл; Комплекти за поправка за уиндфойл; Защитна екипировка за уингфойл
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Wingsurfen > Zubehör für Wingsurfen: Tragetaschen & Hüllen für Wingsurfen; Wingfoil-Leashes; Wingfoil-Pumpen; Wingfoil-Reparatursets; Schutzausrüstung für Wingsurfen
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szárnyszörfözés > Szárnyszörfözési kiegészítők: Szárnyszörfözési hordtáskák és takarók; Wingfoil biztonsági kötelek (leash); Wingfoil pumpák; Wingfoil javítókészletek; Szárnyszörfözési védőfelszerelés
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウイングフォイル > ウィングフォイルアクセサリー: ウィングフォイルキャリーバッグ・カバー; ウィングフォイル用リーシュ; ウィングフォイル用ポンプ; ウィングフォイル用修理キット; ウィングフォイル用プロテクター
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Wingsurfing > Tilbehør til wingsurfing: Bæretasker og afskærmning til wingsurfing; Leashes til wingfoil; Pumper til wingfoil; Reparationssæt til wingfoil; Beskyttelsesudstyr til wingsurfing
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil-utstyr: Wingfoil – bærevesker og deksler; Leasher til wingfoil; Pumper til wingfoil; Reparasjonssett til wingfoil; Wingfoiling – beskyttelsesutstyr
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Wingfoil > Acessórios de wingfoil: Sacos e capas de transporte para wingfoil; Leashes de wingfoil; Bombas para wingfoil; Kits de reparação para wingfoil; Equipamento de proteção para wingfoil
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Wingfoiling > Dodaci za wingfoiling: Torbe i navlake za opremu za wingfoiling; Povodci za wingfoiling; Pumpe za wingfoiling; Kompleti za popravak za wingfoiling; Zaštitna oprema za wingfoiling
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Wingfoil > Accessoires pour wingfoil: Sacs de transport et housses de wingfoil; Leashes de wingfoil; Pompes de wingfoil; Kits de réparation de wingfoil; Équipement de protection pour le wingfoil
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Foilpurjelautailu > Foilpurjelautailuvarusteet: Foilpurjelautailukantolaukut ja -suojat; Wingfoil-karkuremmit; Wingfoil-pumput; Wingfoil-korjauspakkaukset; Foilpurjelautailun suojavarusteet
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Wingfoiling > Accesorios para wingfoil: Fundas y bolsas de transporte para wingfoil; Correas para wingfoil; Infladores para wingfoil; Kits de reparación para wingfoil; Equipo de protección para el wingfoiling
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Вингфойлинг > Аксессуары для вингфойлинга: Сумки и чехлы для вингфойлинга; Лиши для вингфойлинга; Насосы для вингфойлинга; Ремкомплекты для вингфойлинга; Защитная экипировка для вингфойлинга
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil – doplňky: Wingfoil – přepravní tašky a obaly; Leashe pro wingfoil; Pumpy pro wingfoil; Sady na opravu wingfoilů; Wingfoiling – ochranné pomůcky
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Wingfoil > Accessori per wingfoil: Borse da trasporto e coperture per wingfoil; Leash per wingfoil; Pompe per wingfoil; Kit di riparazione per wingfoil; Attrezzatura protettiva per wingfoil
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼 > 水翼風翼配件: 水翼風翼提袋與外罩; 風翼水翼腳繩; 風翼水翼打氣筒; 風翼水翼修補套組; 水翼風翼護具
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Wingfoiling > Accesorii pentru wingfoil: Genți și huse de transport pentru wingfoil; Lese pentru wingfoil; Pompe pentru wingfoil; Kituri de reparație pentru wingfoil; Echipamente de protecție pentru wingfoiling
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Wingfoilen > Wingfoilaccessoires: Wingfoiltassen en hoezen; Wingfoil-leashes; Wingfoil-pompen; Reparatiesets voor wingfoils; Wingfoilbeschermingsuitrusting
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风翼冲浪 > 风翼冲浪配件: 风翼冲浪运输袋与保护套; 风翼脚绳; 风翼打气筒; 风翼维修套件; 风翼冲浪防护装备
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Wingfoiling > Príslušenstvo k wingfoilingu: Tašky a obaly na wingfoiling; Vôdzky s krídlovým profilom; Pumpy na wingfoil; Súpravy na opravu wingfoilu; Ochranné vybavenie k wingfoilingu
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Foilanje > Dodatki za foilanje: Torbe in prevleke za foilanje; Vrvice za wingsurfanje; Črpalke za foilanje s krilom; Kompleti za popravila za foilanje s krilom; Zaščitna oprema za foilanje
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Aitvaravimas > Aitvaravimo priedai: Aitvaravimo krepšiai ir uždangalai; Wingfoil pavadėliai; Aitvaravimo siurbliai; Aitvaravimo remonto rinkiniai; Aitvaravimo apsauginės priemonės
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Wingfoiling > Acessórios de Wingfoil: Bolsas e capas de transporte para wingfoil; Leashes para wingfoil; Bombas para wingfoil; Kits de reparo para wingfoil; Equipamentos de proteção para wingfoil
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván cánh > Phụ kiện lướt ván cánh: Túi đựng và vỏ lướt ván cánh; Dây buộc wingfoil; Bơm wingfoil; Bộ sửa chữa wingfoil; Đồ bảo hộ môn lướt ván cánh